Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GREATER MINNESOTA SENIOR HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Grant program. new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency may make grants to counties and cities to provide up to 50 percent of the capital costs of public infrastructure necessary for an eligible senior housing development project. The commissioner may make a grant award only after determining that nonstate resources are committed to complete the project. The nonstate contribution may be cash, other committed grant funds, or in-kind. In-kind contributions may include the value of the site, whether the site is prepared before or after the law appropriating money for the grant is enacted. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "City" means a statutory or home rule charter city located outside the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) "Housing infrastructure" means publicly owned physical infrastructure necessary to support housing development projects, including but not limited to sewers, water supply systems, utility extensions, streets, wastewater treatment systems, stormwater management systems, and facilities for pretreatment of wastewater to remove phosphorus. new text end new text begin (d) "Senior housing" means housing intended and operated for occupancy by households with at least one person 55 years of age or older. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligible projects. new text end new text begin Housing projects eligible for a grant under this section must be owner-occupied and may be a single-family development, multifamily development, or manufactured home park cooperative qualifying for homestead treatment under Minnesota Statutes, section 273.124, subdivision 3a. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must develop forms and procedures for soliciting and reviewing applications for grants under this section. At a minimum, a city or county must include in its application a resolution of the county board or city council certifying that the required nonstate match is available. The commissioner must evaluate complete applications for funding for eligible projects to determine that: new text end new text begin (1) the project is necessary to increase sites available for housing development that will provide adequate housing stock for the current or future senior population; and new text end new text begin (2) the increase in senior housing will result in substantial public and private capital investment in the county or city in which the project would be located. new text end new text begin (b) The determination of whether to make a grant for a site is within the discretion of the commissioner, subject to this section. The commissioner's decisions and application of the criteria are not subject to judicial review, except for abuse of discretion. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Maximum grant amount. new text end new text begin A county or city may receive no more than $40,000 per lot for single-family, duplex, triplex, or fourplex housing developed; no more than $60,000 per manufactured housing lot; and no more than $180,000 per lot for multifamily housing with more than four units per building. A county or city may receive no more than $500,000 in two years for one or more housing developments. The $500,000 limitation does not apply to manufactured housing developments. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for a grant for the Greater Minnesota Senior Housing Infrastructure Grant Program in section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end